Hawaii statutes.
§387-2 Minimum wages. (a) Except as
provided in section 387‑9 and this section, every employer shall pay to
each employee employed by the employer, wages at the rate of not less than:

(1) $6.25 per hour beginning January 1, 2003;

(2) $6.75 per hour beginning January 1, 2006;

(3) $7.25 per hour beginning January 1, 2007;

(4) $7.75 per hour beginning January 1, 2015;

(5) $8.50 per hour beginning January 1, 2016;

(6) $9.25 per hour beginning January 1, 2017; and

(7) $10.10 per hour beginning January 1, 2018.

(b) The hourly wage of a tipped employee may
be deemed to be increased on account of tips if the employee is paid not less
than:

(1) 25 cents;

(2) 50 cents per hour beginning January 1, 2015; and

(3) 75 cents per hour beginning January 1, 2016,

below the applicable minimum wage by the employee's
employer and the combined amount the employee receives from the employee's
employer and in tips is at least 50 cents more than the applicable minimum
wage; provided that beginning January 1, 2015, the combined amount the employee
receives from the employee's employer and in tips is at least $7.00 more than
the applicable minimum wage. [L Sp 1941, c 66, §3; am L 1943, c 159, §2; RL
1945, §4353; am L 1945, c 15, §1(2); am L 1953, c 77, §1; am L 1955, c 15, §2;
RL 1955, §94-3; am L 1957, c 256, §1; am L 1962, c 16, pt of §2; HRS §387-2; am
L 1969, c 36, §3; am L 1974, c 14, §1; am L 1978, c 4, §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1987, c 224, §1; am L 1990, c 34, §25; am L 1991, c 264, §2; am L 2001, c 279,
§1; am L 2005, c 240, §3; am L 2014, c 82, §1]

Cross References

Service charge disclosure when not distributed as employees'
tip income, see §481B-14.

Case Notes

Defendants not entitled to summary judgment; in appropriate
circumstances, porterage may be considered in the nature of
"gratuities" for the purposes of §387-1 and this section; plaintiffs
raised genuine issue of material fact as to whether "porterage" is a
"gratuity of any kind". 78 H. 351, 893 P.2d 779 (1995).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next